Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-159
Substitution of terms; Revisor of Statutes; duties.

Whenever in the statutes of Nebraska, unless the context otherwise requires, the term mechanic's lien or words referring to such term occur they shall be taken to mean and apply to construction lien as used in sections 52-125 to 52-159. The Revisor of Statutes shall substitute the appropriate term or words in the statutes necessitated by this section.

Laws 1981, LB 512, § 35.